Utah statutes.
26A-1-122.   Counties joining existing department -- Abolition of department
-- Withdrawal of county from department.
(1)  If additional or adjacent counties join an existing local health
department, provisions shall be made for the appointment and terms of new
board members in accordance with the applicable provisions of this part.
(2) (a)  A local health department established under this part may not be
abolished until it has been in existence at least two years.
(b)  A participating county may not withdraw from a local health department
until the county has participated in maintenance of the local health
department for at least two years. The effective date of any withdrawal shall
be December 31.  Ninety days prior written notice of the withdrawal shall be
given to the board.
(3)  If a local health department is abolished, the participating counties
shall establish local health departments under Section 26A-1-103, 26A-1-105,
or 26A-1-106 at least 30 days prior to abolishment.
